src-fst-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
LEXICON NMN_ENIN enin:eni



###  Nominative singular in "r"






###  Nominative singular in "s"
LEXICON NMN_PUHTAHUS/VÄHYS puhtahus:puhtahu




LEXICON NMN_ALUS/ILVES alus:aluks






LEXICON NMN_ARMAS/EVAES armas:arma


LEXICON NMN_VARVAS varvas:varba




LEXICON NMN_VIDEL videl:videl
Gradation No


LEXICON NMN_TUORES tuores:tuore







LEXICON NMN_RAIŠ raiš:ra

LEXICON NMN_KUURNIS kuurnis:kuurne



* LEXICON NMN_OLUT olut:olu






Gradation None



* LEXICON NMN_TULLUT tullut:tullu




LEXICON NMN_TOVESTEH/PEREH pereh:pereh




LEXICON NMN_ARTELI/LEIRI arteli:arteli


LEXICON NMN_PAPPI/HÄKKI pappi:pappi






LEXICON NMN_REBOI/JÄNÖI reboi:reboi


LEXICON NMN_OZA/SÄYNÄ oza:oza











LEXICON NMN_TVER tver:tver
Gradation NA
Front	 Vowel
Singular stem vowel 0/i
Plural stem vowel il%{oö%}i


Gradation NA
Back	 Vowel
Singular stem vowel 0/i
Plural stem vowel il%{oö%}i







LEXICON NMN_VAŽEN važen:važe


LEXICON NMN_LÄMMIN lämmin:lämbi


LEXICON NMN_TAIGIN taigin:taigin

















###  Nominative singular in "v"
* LEXICON NMN_ABRAMOV Abramov:Abramov





### Singular suffixes
















*luadi^WGStem^E1%>tt%{uy%}%>%{uy%} examples:*

*luaji000ttu%>u examples:*



### Plural suffixes













### SINGULAR POSSESSA

LEXICON SGNOM/PXSP3 adding -h


* * *
<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [../src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-olo/blob/main/../src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc)</small>
